en: Tire repair kit components: Adhesive patches; Boot strip; CO₂ cartridges; Glueless patches; Inflator head; Rubber cement; Sandpaper/rasp; Tire levers; Tubeless plugs; Valve core tool; Other
cs: Komponenty sady na opravu pneumatik: Záplaty s lepidlem; Páska na podlepení pláště; Bombičky CO₂; Samolepicí záplaty; Hlavice hustilky; Vulkanizační roztok; Smirkový papír / rašple; Montážní páky; Knoty do bezdušových pneumatik; Klíč na ventily; Jiné
th: ซ่อมยางมองส่วนประกอบ: แผ่นปะแบบมีกาว; แถบรองปะยาง; หลอดก๊าซคาร์บอนไดออกไซด์; แผ่นปะแบบไร้กาว; หัวสูบลม; กาวยาง; กระดาษทราย/ตะไบ; ที่งัดยาง; ไหมปะยาง; เครื่องมือขันศรวาล์ว; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Komponenty súpravy na opravu pneumatík: Lepiace záplaty; Opravná vložka; Bombičky CO₂; Samolepiace záplaty; Hlavica hustilky; Gumové lepidlo; Brúsny papier/rašpľa; Montážne páky; Opravné knôty; Kľúč na ventily; Iné
lt-LT: Padangų remonto rinkinio komponentai: Klijuojami lopai; Padangos lopo juostelė; CO₂ balionėliai; Neklijuojami lopai; Pompavimo galvutė; Guminiai klijai; Švitrinis popierius / dildė; Padangų mentelės; Bekamerinių padangų kaiščiai; Ventilio šerdies įrankis; Kita
ru: Состав ремкомплекта шин: Клеевые заплатки; Армирующая заплатка; Баллончики CO₂; Бесклеевые заплатки; Насадка для накачивания; Резиновый клей; Наждачная бумага/рашпиль; Монтажки для шин; Жгуты для бескамерных шин; Ключ для ниппеля; Другое
vi: Các thành phần trong bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa lốp xe: Miếng vá dán keo; Miếng vá lót lốp; Ống CO₂; Miếng vá không dùng keo; Đầu van bơm; Keo vá cao su; Giấy nhám/cây giũa; Cây nạy lốp; Nút vá lốp không săm; Dụng cụ tháo lõi van; Khác
pt-PT: Componentes do kit de reparação de pneus: Remendos adesivos; Tira de reparação; Cartuchos de CO₂; Remendos sem cola; Cabeça do insuflador; Cola de borracha; Lixa/grosa; Desmonta-pneus; Tampões tubeless; Ferramenta de núcleo de válvula; Outro
tr: Lastik tamir kiti bileşenleri: Yapışkan yamalar; Dış lastik yaması; CO₂ kartuşları; Yapışkansız yamalar; Şişirme başlığı; Kauçuk solüsyonu; Zımpara/Törpü; Lastik levyeleri; Tubeless fitilleri; Sibop iğnesi aleti; Diğer
zh-TW: 輪胎修理套件組件: 黏貼式補胎片; 補胎膠條; 二氧化碳氣瓶; 免膠水補胎片; 打氣筒氣嘴; 橡膠膠水; 砂紙/銼刀; 挖胎棒; 無內胎補胎條; 氣門芯工具; 其他
nl: Onderdelen bandenreparatiekit: Zelfklevende plakkers; Bandenpleister; CO₂-patronen; Lijmloze plakkers; Pompkop; Solutie; Schuurpapier/rasp; Bandenlichters; Tubeless pluggen; Ventielkerngereedschap; Overige
nb: Komponenter i dekkreparasjonssett: Klebende lapper; Dekkappe; CO₂-patroner; Limfrie lapper; Pumpehode; Gummilim; Sandpapir/rasp; Dekkspaker; Plugger for slangeløse dekk; Ventilkjerneverktøy; Annet
ro-RO: Componente ale kitului de reparație pentru anvelope: Petice adezive; Bandă de protecție; Cartușe de CO₂; Petice autoadezive; Cap de umflare; Adeziv pentru cauciuc; Șmirghel/răzuitor; Leviere pentru anvelope; Șnururi tubeless; Cheie pentru ventil; Altele
es: Componentes del kits de reparación de neumáticos: Parches adhesivos; Parche tipo bota; Cartuchos de CO₂; Parches sin pegamento; Cabezal del inflador; Cemento de goma; Lija/escofina; Desmontadores de neumáticos; Tapones para tubeless; Llave para obús de válvula; Otro
el: Εξαρτήματα κιτ επισκευής ελαστικών: Αυτοκόλλητα μπαλώματα; Λωρίδα επισκευής; Αμπούλες CO₂; Μπαλώματα χωρίς κόλλα; Κεφαλή τρόμπας; Κόλλα καουτσούκ; Γυαλόχαρτο/Λίμα; Λεβιέδες ελαστικών; Κορδόνια επισκευής tubeless; Εργαλείο πυρήνα βαλβίδας; Άλλο
pl: Elementy zestawu do naprawy opon: Łatki samoprzylepne; Łatka do opon; Naboje CO₂; Łatki samowulkanizujące (bez kleju); Głowica do pompowania; Klej do opon/dętek; Papier ścierny/tarka; Łyżki do opon; Sznury/kołki do opon bezdętkowych; Kluczyk do zaworów; Inne
ja: タイヤ修理キットコンポーネント: 接着パッチ; タイヤブーツ; 二酸化炭素カートリッジ; グルーレスパッチ; インフレーターヘッド; ラバーセメント; 紙やすり/ヤスリ; タイヤレバー; チューブレスプラグ; バルブコアツール; その他
hr-HR: Komponente seta za popravak gume: Ljepljive zakrpe; Traka za krpanje gume; Ulošci s CO₂; Zakrpe bez ljepila; Glava pumpe; Ljepilo za gumu; Brusni papir / turpija; Poluge za gume; Čepovi za tubeless gume; Alat za jezgru ventila; Ostalo
it: Componenti del kit di riparazione pneumatici: Toppe adesive; Fascia di riparazione; Cartucce di CO₂; Toppe senza colla; Erogatore per gonfiaggio; Mastice per gomma; Carta vetrata/raspa; Cacciagomme; Vermicelli per tubeless; Estrattore per valvola; Altro
sl-SI: Komponente kompleta za popravilo pnevmatik: Samolepilne zaplate; Zaščitni trak za pnevmatiko; Kartuše s CO₂; Zaplate brez lepila; Glava tlačilke; Lepilo za gumo; Brusni papir/strgalo; Orodje za snemanje pnevmatik; Čepi za pnevmatike brez zračnic; Orodje za jedro ventila; Drugo
ko: 타이어 수리 키트 구성품: 접착형 패치; 부트 스트립; CO₂ 카트리지; 무접착제 패치; 인플레이터 헤드; 고무 접착제; 사포/줄; 타이어 레버; 튜블리스 플러그; 밸브 코어 공구; 기타
da: Komponenter i dækreparationssæt: Selvklæbende lapper; Dæklap; CO₂-patroner; Limfri lapper; Pumpehoved; Gummilim; Sandpapir/rasp; Dækjern; Tubeless-propper; Værktøj til ventilkerne; Andet
hu: Gumiabroncs készlet komponensei: Ragasztós foltok; Javítószalag; CO₂-patronok; Öntapadós foltok; Felfújófej; Gumiragasztó; Csiszolópapír/reszelő; Gumileszedők; Tömlő nélküli dugók; Szeleptű-kiszedő; Egyéb
de: Komponenten des Reifenreparatursets: Klebeflicken; Reparaturstreifen; CO₂-Kartuschen; Selbstklebende Flicken; Pumpenkopf; Gummilösung; Schleifpapier/Raspel; Reifenheber; Tubeless-Stopfen; Ventilwerkzeug; Sonstige
sv: Medföljande delar i set för däckreparation: Självhäftande lappar; Förstärkningslapp; CO₂-patroner; Limfria lappar; Pumphuvud; Gummilim; Sandpapper/rasp; Däckavtagare; Tubeless-pluggar; Ventilverktyg; Övrigt
bg-BG: Компоненти на комплект за ремонт на гуми: Залепващи лепенки; Подложка за гума; CO₂ флакони; Безлепилни лепенки; Накрайник за напомпване; Гумено лепило; Шкурка/рашпила; Щанги за гуми; Фитили за безкамерни гуми; Инструмент за игли на вентили; Друго
fr: Composants d'un kit de réparation de pneus: Rustines adhésives; Emplâtre; Cartouches de CO₂; Rustines sans colle; Tête de gonflage; Colle à dissolution; Papier de verre/râpe; Démonte-pneus; Mèches tubeless; Outil pour obus de valve; Autre
zh-CN: 轮胎修理套件组件: 自粘补胎片; 补胎胶条; 二氧化碳气瓶; 免胶补胎片; 充气嘴; 补胎胶水; 砂纸/锉刀; 撬胎棒; 真空胎补胎胶条; 气门芯工具; 其他
pt-BR: Componentes do kit de reparo dos pneus: Remendos adesivos; Manchão/tira de reforço; Cartuchos de CO₂; Remendos sem cola; Bico inflador; Cola vulcanizante; Lixa/grosa; Espátulas para pneu; Plugues para pneu sem câmara; Ferramenta para núcleo de válvula; Outros
fi: Renkaan korjaussarjan osat: Liimattavat paikat; Paikkaliuska; CO₂-kapselit; Liimattomat paikat; Täyttöpää; Kumiliima; Hiekkapaperi/raspi; Rengasraudat; Tubeless-paikat; Venttiilityökalu; Muu